vendor/org_heigl/hyphenator/src/Org/Heigl/Hyphenator/share/files/dictionaries/hyph_fr.dic
suré1mi
surémi1ne
surémi3nent.
t1c2h
t1he
t1ra
t1re
t1ri
t1ru
t1t2l
ta1c2h
ta1me
ta2ment.
tac2hy
tachy1a2
tan1ge
tan3gent.
tc2hi
tchin3t2
tem1pé
tempé1ra
tempéra1me
tempéra3ment.
ter1ge
ter3gent.
tes1ta
testa1me
testa3ment.
th1re
th1ri
th2r
ther1mo
thermo1s2
thril3l
to1me
to2ment.
tor1re
tor3rent.
tran2s1a2
tran2s1o2
tran2s1u2
tran2s3h
tran2s3p
tran3s2act
tran3s2ats
trans1pa
transpa1re
transpa3rent.
tri1de
tri3dent.
tru1cu
trucu1le
trucu3lent.
tu1me
tu2ment.
tung2s3
tur1bu
turbu1le
turbu3lent.
té1lé
télé1e2
télé1i2
télé1o2b
télé1o2p
télé1s2
u1ci
u1ni
u1vi
u2s3t2r
ucil4l
ue1vi
uevil4l
uni1a2x
uni1o2v
uvil4l
v1re
va1ci
va1ni
vacil4l
vanil1li
vanil2l
vanil3lin
vanil3lis
ve1ni
ven1t2r
veni1me
veni2ment.
vent1ri
ventri1po
ventripo1te
ventripo3tent.
vi1di
vidi1me
vidi2ment.
vil3l
vol1ta
vol2t1amp
vé1lo
vélo1s2ki
wa2g3n
xil3l
y1al1gi
y1as1t2h
y1s2tom
ys1to
â1me
â2ment.
è1me
è2ment.
é1ce
é1ci
é1cu
é1d2r
é1de
é1le
é1li
é1lo
é1lé
é1mi
é1ne
é1ni
é1pi
é1q
é1re
é3cent.
é3dent.
é3quent.
é3rent.
éci1me
éci2ment.
écu1me
écu2ment.
éd1ri
éd2hi
édri1q
éli1me
éli2ment.
élo1q
élo3quent.
élé1me
émil4l
éni1te
éni3tent.
épi2s3cop
épi3s4co1pe
épis1co
équi1po
équi1va
équipo1te
équipo3tent.
équiva1le
équiva4lent.
ô1me
ô2ment.
